Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-2831.01
Applicability of change to law.

(1) Any health care provider who has furnished proof of financial responsibility prior to January 1, 2025, under sections 44-2824 and 44-2827 shall be qualified under section 44-2824 for the remainder of the policy year or risk-loss trust year.

(2) The increases in coverage requirements made by Laws 2004, LB 998, in sections 44-2824 and 44-2827 shall apply to policies issued or renewed and risk-loss trust years that commence after January 1, 2005, and before January 1, 2025.

(3) The changes made to sections 44-2825, 44-2832, and 44-2833 by Laws 2004, LB 998, apply commencing with policies issued or renewed and risk-loss trust years that commence after January 1, 2005, and before January 1, 2025.

(4) The increases in coverage requirements made by Laws 2023, LB92, in sections 44-2824 and 44-2827 shall apply to policies issued or renewed and risk-loss trust years that commence on or after January 1, 2025.

(5) The changes made to sections 44-2825, 44-2832, and 44-2833 by Laws 2023, LB92, apply commencing with policies issued or renewed and risk-loss trust years that commence on or after January 1, 2025.

Laws 2004, LB 998, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 60.